Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Religious Entities

66-2-201. Ownership of land.

Any religious denomination, religious society, or church, whether incorporated or not, may take, by deed or otherwise, and hold any amount of acreage at one (1) place for purposes of public worship, or for a parsonage, or for a burial ground.

Code 1858, § 1508 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 110); Acts 1889, ch. 11, § 1; Shan., § 2562; mod. Code 1932, § 4407; Acts 1957, ch. 206, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-203.

Cross-References. Cemeteries owned by religious societies, exemption from certain regulations, §46-1-106.

Not for profit religious corporations, title 48, ch. 67.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 185.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 3; 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 2, 21; 21 Tenn. Juris., Religious Societies, §§ 2, 7.

Law Reviews.

An Overview of the Tennessee Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 109 (1977).

66-2-202. Title in trustees.

All lands bought or otherwise acquired by any religious denomination or society shall be vested in a board of trustees or other persons designated by the members of such denomination or society, for the use and benefit of the denomination or society.

Code 1858, § 1509 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 79, § 1); Shan., § 2563; Code 1932, § 4408; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-204.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-210.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Religious Societies, §§ 5, 7.

66-2-203. Conveyance by church officers.

In all cases where any elders, trustees, or other church officers, in any of the churches or organizations of any religious denomination, shall have any lands conveyed to them for the use of their respective churches or congregations as building sites, or for any other purpose, by deed, grant, devise, or in any other manner, they or their successors in office, according to the regulations of such church or congregation, may sell and convey the same by deed, which deed, when officially signed by such elders, trustees, or other church officers, or their successors in office, shall pass the title, whether for life, for years, or in fee, to such land to the purchaser in as full and ample a manner as if the officers held the same as a corporation, and had conveyed it by deed under the corporate name.

Acts 1883, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 2564; Code 1932, § 4409; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-205.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 185.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-210.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 3; 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 10; 21 Tenn. Juris., Religious Societies, §§ 2, 5, 7.